Wisconsin, session 2025, AB590.
do enact as follows:AB590,11Section 1. 448.95 (7) of the statutes is repealed and recreated to read:AB590,2,62448.95 (7) “Physical activity” means moderate or greater participation in 3exercise, sports, games, recreation, wellness, fitness, or employment activities. For 4purposes of this subsection, “moderate participation” is activity that increases the 5participant’s heart rate and breathing rate but that does not make it difficult for the 6participant to hold a conversation.AB590,2,77